Hawaii statutes.
[§431:2-404] Restitution. Any person
convicted under this part shall be ordered by a court to make restitution to
any insurer, person, or licensee for any financial loss sustained by that
insurer, person, or licensee that was caused by the act or acts for which the
person was convicted. [L 2009, c 149, pt of §2]

Previous
Vol09_Ch0431-0435H
Next